Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-405
Veterans relief; obtaining by fraud; penalty.

Any person who shall knowingly, by fraudulent representations, obtain or attempt to obtain any payment or aid herein provided for shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1921, c. 40, § 5, p. 183;

C.S.1922, § 6210;

C.S.1929, § 80-405;

R.S.1943, § 80-405;

Laws 1953, c. 326, § 3, p. 1080;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 264.